Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 2

Times of Elections

2-3-201. Hours of election.

Polling places shall be open for voting for a minimum of ten (10) continuous hours but no more than thirteen (13) hours. All polling places in counties in the eastern time zone shall close at eight o'clock p.m. (8:00 p.m.) prevailing time and polling places in counties in the central time zone shall close at seven o'clock p.m. (7:00 p.m.) prevailing time.

At least fifteen (15) days before the date of each election, the county election commission shall determine a uniform time for the opening of all polling places in the county.

All polling places shall open at eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) prevailing time in counties having a population according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census of:

not less than nor more than

63,700 63,800

28,200 28,300

24,200 24,300

23,475 23,500

In any county having a population of not less than one hundred twenty thousand (120,000) according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, all polling places shall open by eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) prevailing time, but nothing shall prevent an earlier opening time in the discretion of the county election commission.

In the case of municipal elections in a municipality having a population of not more than five thousand (5,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, where there is no opposition for any of the offices involved, the polling places shall open at the hour of ten o'clock a.m. (10:00 a.m.) and close at the hour of six o'clock p.m. (6:00 p.m.).

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-307; Acts 1980, ch. 649, §§ 4, 5; 1981, ch. 385, §§ 1, 2; 1982, ch. 665, § 1; 1999, ch. 197, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Failure to use standard time, §4-1-401.

2-3-202. Judicial and county officers — Time for election.

Elections for the following offices shall be held at the regular August election when the election immediately precedes the commencement of a full term:

Assessor of property;

Constable;

County clerk and clerks of the circuit and other courts;

County trustee;

District attorney general;

Judges of all courts;

Members of the county legislative body;

Register; and

Sheriff.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978, ch. 934, § 28; T.C.A., § 2-308; Acts 1980, ch. 860, § 1; T.C.A. §2-8-117.

Cross-References. Election of assessor of property, §67-1-502.

Election of judges generally, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 4; §§16-3-101,17-1-103.

Election of judges of the court of criminal appeals, §16-5-103.

Times of elections, Tenn. Const., art. VII, § 5.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of municipal charter amendment that extends term of elected officials, OAG 00-017 (2/8/00).

Collateral References.

Validity of public election as affected by fact that it was held at time other than that fixed by law. 121 A.L.R. 987.

2-3-203. General assembly members, congressional representatives, presidential electors, and governor — Time for election.

Elections for the following offices shall be held at the regular November election when the election immediately precedes the commencement of a full term:

Representative in the general assembly;

Representative in the United States congress;

Senator in the general assembly;

Senator in the United States senate;

Governor; and

Electors for president and vice president.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-309; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 55.

Cross-References. Time of election of members of general assembly, Tenn. Const., art. II, § 7.

2-3-204. Elections on questions.

Elections on questions submitted to the people shall be held on dates set by the county election commission but not less than seventy-five (75) days nor more than ninety (90) days after the county election commission is directed to hold the election under the law authorizing or requiring the election on the question. If the election is to be held in more than one (1) county, the county election commissions shall meet and set the date jointly.

Resolutions, ordinances or petitions requiring the holding of elections on questions submitted to the people which are to be held with the regular August election, the regular November election, any regularly scheduled municipal election or the presidential preference primary shall be filed with the county election commission not less than seventy-five (75) days prior to such election.

If the date for an election on a question, as set by a county election commission or by two (2) or more commissions jointly, falls within ninety (90) days of an upcoming regular primary or general election being held in the jurisdiction voting on the question, the commission or commissions may reset the date of the election on a question to coincide with the regular primary or general election, even though this may be outside of the time period established herein. All dates dependent on the date of the election shall be adjusted accordingly and any acts required to be done by these dates shall be performed timely if done in accordance with the adjusted dates.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-310; Acts 1980, ch. 649, § 1; 1981, ch. 478, § 9; 1997, ch. 558, § 2; 2000, ch. 756, § 6; 2014, ch. 724, § 11; 2016, ch. 827, §§ 4, 5.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment substituted “seventy-five (75) days” for “sixty (60) days” near the end of (b).

The 2016 amendment, in (a), substituted “seventy-five (75)” for “forty-five (45)” and “ninety (90)” for “sixty (60)”; and in (c), substituted “ninety (90)” for “thirty (30)”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 724, § 12. April 16, 2014.

Acts 2016, ch. 827, § 7. April 21, 2016.

Attorney General Opinions. Special elections on general obligation bonds for school purposes, OAG 99-034 (2/18/99).

2-3-205. All elections on same day to be held at same time and place.

All elections held on the same day in a county shall be held during the same hours and in the same polling places in the precincts where the elections are to be held.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-311.

2-3-206. Runoff following primary election for municipal office — Procedure for absentee voting required.

Notwithstanding any provision of this title to the contrary, in any municipality in which the charter of such municipality provides for a runoff election following a primary election for municipal office, such runoff election may be held not less than thirty (30) days following the primary election.

Notwithstanding any provision of this title to the contrary, the county election commission holding such runoff election shall provide a procedure for absentee voting in such election.

Notwithstanding any private act or charter provision to the contrary, when a run-off election is scheduled to be held after a general election in any county having a metropolitan form of government, the run-off election shall be set by the election commission, not less than thirty (30) nor more than forty-five (45) days after the regular election.

Acts 1980, ch. 590, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross-References. Absentee voting, title 2, ch. 6, part 2.